Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 101. Wagering Contracts

§ 3981.
Loser may recover loss.

A person who pays money or other valuable thing lost at a game or sport or horse race may recover the value thereof of the person to whom it was paid in a civil action, if commenced within one month from the time of payment.

§ 3982.
Void contracts.

Contracts, promises, notes, bills, bonds, judgments, and other assurances, and mortgages, conveyances, or securities made and executed by a person in which any part of the consideration is for money or other valuable thing won on any of the aforesaid games, or borrowed or lent for such purpose at the time and place of gaming, shall be null and void.